gc_lang/fr/oxt/Dictionnaires/dictionaries/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX c5 éguer èguerais/n'j'm't' éguer
SFX c5 éler èlerais/n'j'm't' éler
SFX c5 émer èmerais/n'j'm't' émer
SFX c5 éner ènerais/n'j'm't' éner
SFX c5 éper èperais/n'j'm't' éper
SFX c5 équer èquerais/n'j'm't' équer
SFX c5 érer èrerais/n'j'm't' érer
SFX c5 éser èserais/n'j'm't' éser
SFX c5 éter èterais/n'j'm't' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètrerais/n'j'm't' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvrerais/n'j'm't' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èyerais/n'j'm't' éyer
SFX c5 er erait/n'q'm't's' er
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerait/n'q'm't's' ébrer
SFX c5 écer ècerait/n'q'm't's' écer
SFX c5 écher ècherait/n'q'm't's' écher
SFX c5 écrer ècrerait/n'q'm't's' écrer
SFX c5 éder èderait/n'q'm't's' éder
SFX c5 éger ègerait/n'q'm't's' éger
SFX c5 égler èglerait/n'q'm't's' égler
SFX c5 égner ègnerait/n'q'm't's' égner
SFX c5 égrer ègrerait/n'q'm't's' égrer
SFX c5 éguer èguerait/n'q'm't's' éguer
SFX c5 éler èlerait/n'q'm't's' éler
SFX c5 émer èmerait/n'q'm't's' émer
SFX c5 éner ènerait/n'q'm't's' éner
SFX c5 éper èperait/n'q'm't's' éper
SFX c5 équer èquerait/n'q'm't's' équer
SFX c5 érer èrerait/n'q'm't's' érer
SFX c5 éser èserait/n'q'm't's' éser
SFX c5 éter èterait/n'q'm't's' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètrerait/n'q'm't's' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvrerait/n'q'm't's' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èyerait/n'q'm't's' éyer
SFX c5 er erions/n't' er
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerions/n't' ébrer
SFX c5 écer ècerions/n't' écer
SFX c5 écher ècherions/n't' écher
SFX c5 écrer ècrerions/n't' écrer
SFX c5 éder èderions/n't' éder
SFX c5 éger ègerions/n't' éger
SFX c5 égler èglerions/n't' égler
SFX c5 égner ègnerions/n't' égner
SFX c5 égrer ègrerions/n't' égrer
SFX c5 éguer èguerions/n't' éguer
SFX c5 éler èlerions/n't' éler
SFX c5 émer èmerions/n't' émer
SFX c5 éner ènerions/n't' éner
SFX c5 éper èperions/n't' éper
SFX c5 équer èquerions/n't' équer
SFX c5 érer èrerions/n't' érer
SFX c5 éser èserions/n't' éser
SFX c5 éter èterions/n't' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètrerions/n't' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvrerions/n't' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èyerions/n't' éyer
SFX c5 er eriez/n'm' er
SFX c5 ébrer èbreriez/n'm' ébrer
SFX c5 écer èceriez/n'm' écer
SFX c5 écher ècheriez/n'm' écher
SFX c5 écrer ècreriez/n'm' écrer
SFX c5 éder èderiez/n'm' éder
SFX c5 éger ègeriez/n'm' éger
SFX c5 égler ègleriez/n'm' égler
SFX c5 égner ègneriez/n'm' égner
SFX c5 égrer ègreriez/n'm' égrer
SFX c5 éguer ègueriez/n'm' éguer
SFX c5 éler èleriez/n'm' éler
SFX c5 émer èmeriez/n'm' émer
SFX c5 éner èneriez/n'm' éner
SFX c5 éper èperiez/n'm' éper
SFX c5 équer èqueriez/n'm' équer
SFX c5 érer èreriez/n'm' érer
SFX c5 éser èseriez/n'm' éser
SFX c5 éter èteriez/n'm' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètreriez/n'm' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvreriez/n'm' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èyeriez/n'm' éyer
SFX c5 er eraient/n'q'm't's' er
SFX c5 ébrer èbreraient/n'q'm't's' ébrer
SFX c5 écer èceraient/n'q'm't's' écer
SFX c5 écher ècheraient/n'q'm't's' écher
SFX c5 écrer ècreraient/n'q'm't's' écrer
SFX c5 éder èderaient/n'q'm't's' éder
SFX c5 éger ègeraient/n'q'm't's' éger
SFX c5 égler ègleraient/n'q'm't's' égler
SFX c5 égner ègneraient/n'q'm't's' égner
SFX c5 égrer ègreraient/n'q'm't's' égrer
SFX c5 éguer ègueraient/n'q'm't's' éguer
SFX c5 éler èleraient/n'q'm't's' éler
SFX c5 émer èmeraient/n'q'm't's' émer
SFX c5 éner èneraient/n'q'm't's' éner
SFX c5 éper èperaient/n'q'm't's' éper
SFX c5 équer èqueraient/n'q'm't's' équer
SFX c5 érer èreraient/n'q'm't's' érer
SFX c5 éser èseraient/n'q'm't's' éser
SFX c5 éter èteraient/n'q'm't's' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètreraient/n'q'm't's' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvreraient/n'q'm't's' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èyeraient/n'q'm't's' éyer
SFX c5 er asse/n'j'm't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 écer éçasse/n'j'm't' écer
SFX c5 éger égeasse/n'j'm't' éger
SFX c5 er asses/n'm't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 écer éçasses/n'm't' écer
SFX c5 éger égeasses/n'm't' éger
SFX c5 er ât/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c5 écer éçât/n'q'm't's' écer
SFX c5 éger égeât/n'q'm't's' éger
SFX c5 er assions/n't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 écer éçassions/n't' écer
SFX c5 éger égeassions/n't' éger
SFX c5 er assiez/n'm' [^cg]er
SFX c5 écer éçassiez/n'm' écer
SFX c5 éger égeassiez/n'm' éger
SFX c5 er assent/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c5 écer éçassent/n'q'm't's' écer
SFX c5 éger égeassent/n'q'm't's' éger
SFX c5 ébrer èbre/n'm' ébrer
SFX c5 écer èce/n'm' écer
SFX c5 écher èche/n'm' écher
SFX c5 écrer ècre/n'm' écrer
SFX c5 éder ède/n'm' éder
SFX c5 éger ège/n'm' éger
SFX c5 égler ègle/n'm' égler
SFX c5 égner ègne/n'm' égner
SFX c5 égrer ègre/n'm' égrer
SFX c5 éguer ègue/n'm' éguer
SFX c5 éler èle/n'm' éler
SFX c5 émer ème/n'm' émer
SFX c5 éner ène/n'm' éner
SFX c5 éper èpe/n'm' éper
SFX c5 équer èque/n'm' équer
SFX c5 érer ère/n'm' érer
SFX c5 éser èse/n'm' éser
SFX c5 éter ète/n'm' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètre/n'm' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvre/n'm' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èye/n'm' éyer
SFX c5 er ons/n' [^cg]er
SFX c5 écer éçons/n' écer
SFX c5 éger égeons/n' éger
SFX c5 er ez/n' er

SFX d0 N 113
SFX d0 er ant er
SFX d0 eter ette jeter
SFX d0 eter ette [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter ète [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elle ppeler
SFX d0 eler elle [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èle [^p].eler
SFX d0 er è er
SFX d0 eter ettes jeter
SFX d0 eter ettes [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter ètes [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elles ppeler
SFX d0 eler elles [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èles [^p].eler
SFX d0 er ons er
SFX d0 er ez er
SFX d0 eter ettent jeter
SFX d0 eter ettent [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter ètent [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellent ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellent [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlent [^p].eler
SFX d0 er ais er
SFX d0 er ait er
SFX d0 er ions er
SFX d0 er iez er
SFX d0 er aient er
SFX d0 er ai er
SFX d0 er as er
SFX d0 er a er
SFX d0 er âmes er
SFX d0 er âtes er
SFX d0 er èrent er
SFX d0 eter etterai jeter
SFX d0 eter etterai [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterai [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerai ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerai [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerai [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etteras jeter
SFX d0 eter etteras [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èteras [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleras ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleras [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èleras [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter ettera jeter
SFX d0 eter ettera [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter ètera [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellera ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellera [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlera [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etterons jeter
SFX d0 eter etterons [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterons [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerons ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerons [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerons [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etterez jeter
SFX d0 eter etterez [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterez [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerez ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerez [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerez [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etteront jeter
SFX d0 eter etteront [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èteront [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleront ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleront [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èleront [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etterais jeter
SFX d0 eter etterais [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterais [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerais ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerais [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerais [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etterait jeter
SFX d0 eter etterait [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterait [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerait ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerait [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerait [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etterions jeter
SFX d0 eter etterions [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterions [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerions ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerions [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerions [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etteriez jeter
SFX d0 eter etteriez [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èteriez [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleriez ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleriez [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èleriez [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etteraient jeter
SFX d0 eter etteraient [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èteraient [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleraient ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleraient [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èleraient [^p].eler
SFX d0 er asse er
SFX d0 er asses er
SFX d0 er ât er
SFX d0 er assions er
SFX d0 er assiez er
SFX d0 er assent er
SFX d0 eter ette jeter
SFX d0 eter ette [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter ète [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elle ppeler
SFX d0 eler elle [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èle [^p].eler
SFX d0 er ons er
SFX d0 er ez er
